apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="amav/isse__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ero</l>     <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erimus</l>  <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eris</l>    <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eritis</l>  <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erit</l>    <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erint</l>   <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l>       <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imus</l>    <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isti</l>    <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>istis</l>   <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l>      <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erunt</l>   <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eram</l>    <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eramus</l>  <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eras</l>    <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eratis</l>  <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erat</l>    <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erant</l>   <r>isse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amat/us__vblex">
      <e><p><l>o</l>    <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l>    <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l>    <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>um</l>   <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>    <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l>   <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>   <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orum</l> <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>   <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l>   <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l>    <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l>    <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l>    <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ae</l>   <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ae</l>   <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l>   <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l>    <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l>    <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>   <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arum</l> <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>   <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l>   <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ae</l>   <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ae</l>   <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l>    <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l>    <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l>    <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>um</l>   <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>um</l>   <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>um</l>   <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>   <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orum</l> <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>   <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l>    <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l>    <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l>    <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "abscido" ><i>cis</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "absisto" ><i>abstit</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "adhortor" ><i>at</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "adimo" ><i>adem</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "advoco" ><i>advocat</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "aegroto" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "annihilo" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "antevenio" ><i>anteven</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "assuefacio" ><i>assuefact</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "attempto" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "benefacio" ><i>fact</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "caleo" ><i>u</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "circumiaceo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "circumvenio" ><i>circumven</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "competo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "commoveo" ><i>commov</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "concaco" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "condico" ><i>dix</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "congredior" ><i>congress</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "consido" ><i>consed</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "contendo" ><i>content</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "consaluto" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "crispo" ><i>placehold</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "decumbo" ><i>cubu</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "defloresco" ><i>placehold</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "demo" ><i>demps</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "deploro" ><i>at</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "desuesco" ><i>suev</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "detumesco" ><i>placehold</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "dilacero" ><i>av</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "dirumpo" ><i>rupt</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "distinguo" ><i>distinx</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "divexo" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "effundo" ><i>effud</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "elicio" ><i>placehold</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "evinco" ><i>vic</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "evomo" ><i>it</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "exoro" ><i>exorav</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "expavefacio" ><i>fact</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "extollo" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "extrico" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "flaveo" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "fleo" ><i>flev</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "gestio" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "grator" ><i>su</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "immergo" ><i>mers</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "impertio" ><i>o</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "incedo" ><i>incess</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "incoquo" ><i>cox</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ingemino" ><i>ingeminat</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "initio" ><i>initiav</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "instruo" ><i>instruct</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "interficio" ><i>interfec</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "inundo" ><i>inundat</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "irrumo" ><i>irrumav</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "latrocinor" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "liqueo" ><i>licuiliqu</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "mancipo" ><i>at</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "merso" ><i>av</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "moneo" ><i>monit</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "nixor" ><i>su</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "nutrio" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "obstringo" ><i>strinx</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "obvenio" ><i>vent</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "osculor" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pallesco" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "percipio" ><i>percep</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "perdo" ><i>perdit</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "perstringo" ><i>strinx</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pertendo" ><i>placehold</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pondero" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "porrigo" ><i>porrect</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "praescribo" ><i>scrips</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "praesentio" ><i>praesens</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "progermino" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "prolato" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "provolo" ><i>placeholde</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pugno" ><i>pugnav</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "recurso" ><i>recursat</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "redimio" ><i>imi</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "remulceo" ><i>muls</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "rependo" ><i>pend</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "retransmitto" ><i>mis</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "saepio" ><i>saept</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "satisdo" ><i>sati</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "sopio" ><i>sopiv</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "strideo" ><i>stri</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "sublabor" ><i>su</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "tabesco" ><i>placehold</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "tingo" ><i>tinx</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "velo" ><i>velat</i><par n="amat/us__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "vireo" ><i>viru</i><par n="amav/isse__vblex"/></e>
